praksid/praks3/sofia-kodutöö3/kriuchkova_parandamine.xfscript
# parandused sõna keskuses

define parandamine [ ?* -> [h v] || [k o] _ [e r] ] .o. [ ? -> o || k _ [h v e r] ] .o.
	      [ ? -> r || [k o h v e ] _ ] .o. [ ?* -> [i g] || s _ a ] .o. 
	      [ ? -> s || _ [i g a] ] .o. [ ? -> a || [s i g] _ ];

regex parandamine;
